Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7615
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 15.